Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
182

RESERVATION
AND DISPOSITION OF

GOVERNMENT
MINERAL RIGHTS

Section

182-1 Definitions

182-2 Mineral rights reserved to the State

182-3 Bond; compensation to occupiers

182-4 Mining leases on state lands

182-5 Mining leases on reserved lands

182-6 Exploration

182-7 Lease

182-8 Number of leases; acreage limitations;
area covered

by lease

182-9 Deposit; first year's rental

182-9.5 Unitization

182-10 Revocation of mining leases

182-11 Assignment

182-12 Acquisition of rights-of-way

182-13 Surrender of mining leases

182-14 Rules

182-15 Other use of surface of state lands

182-16 Levy and assessment of general excise tax

182-17 Penalty for violation

182-18 Geothermal royalties

Note

Consultation and public input from Native Hawaiian community
and general public when developing geothermal energy resources with public land
trust lands. L 2012, c 193, §2.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Attorney General Opinions

Section 206 of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act controls
over the provisions of this chapter as applied to Hawaiian home lands, and the
department of Hawaiian home lands has the authority to manage and dispose of
geothermal resources on its lands. Att. Gen. Op. 14-1.

Law Journals and Reviews

Comment, Ownership of Geothermal Resources in Hawaii. 1 UH
L. Rev. 69.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next